Texas, session 892, HB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 125 (H.B. 914), Acts of the 88th Legislature, Regular Session, 2023, is amended by adding Section 3A to read as follows: Sec. 3A.  This Act may be cited as the Terrin Solbrig Act. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.